Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 2095.6, as


amended by Section 4, Chapter 218, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2095.6), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2095.6. A. Applicants for a license shall apply on a


form as prescribed by the Administrator of Consumer Credit.


B. In order to fulfill the purposes of the Oklahoma Secure and


Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act, the Administrator is


authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the


Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry or other


entities designated by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System


and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction

Req. No. 439 Page 1


fees or other fees related to licensees or other entities or


individuals subject to the Oklahoma Secure and Fair Enforcement for


Mortgage Licensing Act.


C. In connection with an application for licensing as a


mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish


to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry


information concerning the applicant’s identity including:


1. Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of


Investigation and any governmental agency or entity authorized to


receive such information for a state, national and international


criminal history background check; and


2. Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the


Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and the


Administrator to obtain:


a. an independent credit report obtained from a consumer


reporting agency defined in 15 U.S.C., Section


1681a(p), and


b. information related to any administrative, civil or


criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.


D. In connection with an application for licensing as a


mortgage broker or mortgage lender, the applicant shall, at a


minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and


Registry information concerning each owner, officer, director or


partner, as applicable including:

Req. No. 439 Page 2


1. Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of


Investigation and any governmental agency or entity authorized to


receive such information for a state, national and international


criminal history background check; and


2. Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the


Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and the


Administrator to obtain:


a. an independent credit report obtained from a consumer


reporting agency described in 15 U.S.C., Section


1681a(p), and


b. information related to any administrative, civil or


criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.


E. For purposes of this section and in order to reduce points


of contact which the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to


maintain for purposes of paragraph 1 and subparagraph b of paragraph


of subsection D of this section, the Administrator may use the


Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry as a channeling


agent for requesting information from and distributing information


to the United States Department of Justice or any governmental


agency.


F. For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the


points of contact which the Administrator may have to maintain for


purposes of subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 2 of subsection D of


this section, the Administrator may use the Nationwide Multistate

Req. No. 439 Page 3


Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting


and distributing information to and from any source so directed by


the Administrator.


G. A license issued under the Oklahoma Secure and Fair


Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act shall be valid for a period


of one (1) year, unless otherwise revoked or suspended by the


Administrator as provided in the Oklahoma Secure and Fair


Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act.


H. The Administrator, on determining that the applicant is


qualified and upon payment of the fees by the applicant, shall issue


a license to the applicant. An applicant who has been denied a


license may not reapply for the license for sixty (60) days from the


date of the previous application. A new license issued on or after


November 1 shall be effective through December 31 of the following


calendar year.


I. A licensee shall pay the renewal fee on or before December


1. If the license is not renewed by December 1, the licensee shall


pay a late renewal fee as prescribed by rule of the Commission on


Consumer Credit. Licenses not renewed by December 31 shall expire


and the licensee shall not act as a mortgage broker, mortgage lender


or mortgage loan originator until a new license is issued pursuant


to the Oklahoma Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing


Act. A license shall not be granted to the holder of an expired


license except as provided in the Oklahoma Secure and Fair

Req. No. 439 Page 4


Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act for the issuance of an


original license.


J. A licensee shall prominently display the mortgage broker,


mortgage lender or mortgage loan originator license in the principal


place of business of the mortgage broker, mortgage lender or


mortgage loan originator and any branch office of the mortgage


broker or mortgage lender.


K. 1. An applicant for a mortgage broker or mortgage lender


license shall pay a fee of One Thousand Two Hundred Dollars


($1,200.00). This fee shall cover the application fee and


examination fee for all registered locations, including any changes


of address.


2. Mortgage broker or mortgage lender licenses may be renewed


by submitting an annual assessment fee of One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00). Mortgage lender licenses shall be renewed by


submitting an annual assessment fee. The mortgage lender annual


assessment fee shall:


a. be based on the dollar volume of loans originated for


residential real property located in Oklahoma during


the twelve-month period ending June 30,


b. be based on the dollar volume of loans serviced for


residential real property located in Oklahoma as


reported on the Q2 mortgage call report for the period


ending on June 30,

Req. No. 439 Page 5


c. be determined by applying a factor of eight-


thousandths of a percent (0.008%) of the dollar volume


of loans originated and the dollar volume of loans


serviced in Oklahoma, and


d. cover:


(1) the renewal fee for the principal office and any


branches, and


(2) any examination-related costs incurred by the


Department of Consumer Credit.


3. Beginning November 1, 2024, the annual assessment fee shall


not be:


a. less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),


b. more than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for the


portion of the assessment calculated according to


subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of this subsection, nor


c. more than Seventeen Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($17,500.00) for the portion of the assessment


calculated according to subparagraph b of paragraph 2


of this subsection.


4. Beginning November 1, 2025, the annual assessment fee shall


not be:


a. less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),





Req. No. 439 Page 6


b. more than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for the


portion of the assessment calculated according to


subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of this subsection, nor


c. more than Twenty-seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($27,500.00) for the portion of the assessment


calculated according to subparagraph b of paragraph 2


of this subsection.


5. Beginning November 1, 2026, the annual assessment fee shall


not be:


a. less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),


b. more than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for the


portion of the assessment calculated according to


subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of this subsection, nor


c. more than Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00)


for the portion of the assessment calculated according


to subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of this subsection.


6. Beginning November 1, 2027, the annual assessment fee shall


not be:


a. less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),


b. more than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for the


portion of the assessment calculated according to


subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of this subsection, nor





Req. No. 439 Page 7


c. more than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for the


portion of the assessment calculated according to


subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of this subsection.


7. A late renewal fee shall be as prescribed by rule of the


Commission on Consumer Credit.


8. Branch offices shall be registered with the Department and


shall be accompanied by an initial registration fee of One Hundred


Fifty Dollars ($150.00).


9. A fee as prescribed by rule of the Commission on Consumer


Credit shall be charged for each license change, duplicate license


or returned check.


10. A fee as prescribed by rule of the Commission on Consumer


Credit shall be paid by applicants and licensees into the Oklahoma


Mortgage Broker and Mortgage Loan Originator Recovery Fund as


provided for in Section 2095.20 of this title for each initial


application and each renewal application.


11. Each additional trade name used by a licensee shall be


registered with the Department and shall be accompanied by an


initial registration fee of One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00).


12. The Administrator of Consumer Credit may reinstate a


license within thirty-one (31) days of the expiration of the license


if the licensee pays the assessment fees and a reinstatement fee of


Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). A licensee shall not be reinstated


when the renewal application, fees, or any required information is

Req. No. 439 Page 8


received on or after February 1 of the following year that the


renewal application was due.


13. The Administrator may reduce annual assessment fees on a


pro rata basis for a specific renewal period by reducing the factor


applied to the dollar volume of loans originated and serviced. The


Administrator shall notify licensees of an annual assessment fee


reduction prior to November 1 of the specific license renewal


period. An annual assessment fee does not include an initial


license fee for purposes of this subsection.


L. 1. An applicant for an initial mortgage loan originator


license shall pay a fee of Four Hundred Fifty Dollars ($450.00).


2. An applicant renewing a mortgage loan originator license


shall pay a fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).


3. A late renewal fee shall be as prescribed by rule of the


Commission on Consumer Credit.


4. A fee as prescribed by rule of the Commission shall be paid


by applicants and licensees into the Oklahoma Mortgage Broker and


Mortgage Loan Originator Recovery Fund, as provided in Section


2095.20 of this title, for each initial application and each renewal


application.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-748 CAD 1/16/2025 3:01:31 PM



Req. No. 439 Page 9